Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,119
Exclusivity of subpart.

(MBCA 8.59) A corporation
may provide indemnification or advance expenses to a director or an officer
only as permitted by sections 21-2,110 to 21-2,119.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 119.